Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.180

Fees for inspection and certification.

The director shall prescribe the necessary fees to be charged to the licensee or owner for the inspection and certification of any fruits or vegetables subject to the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted hereunder. The fees provided for in this section shall become due and payable by the end of the next business day and if such fees are not paid within the prescribed time, the director may withdraw inspection or refuse to perform any inspection or certification services for the person in arrears: PROVIDED, That the director in such instances may demand and collect inspection and certification fees prior to inspecting and certifying any fruits or vegetables for such person.

[ 1961 c 29 s 18.]